Illinois, session 104th, HB289.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Lake Management Program Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 25/1)  (from Ch. 19, par. 1401)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Lake Management Program Act."9(Source: P.A. 86-939.)